District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.83

Duties of the Department of Health.

The Department of Health shall monitor breastfeeding rates in the District of Columbia, the number and nature of complaints regarding violations of this part received by the Office of Human Rights, and any benefits reported by working breastfeeding mothers and employers to the Department of Health. The Department of Health shall issue annual reports of its findings to the Council.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, § 283
as added Dec. 11, 2007, D.C. Law 17-58, § 2(b), 54 DCR 10714
Procurement, bonds and construction, nondiscrimination provisions, see § 2-305.08.